Washington statutes.
RCW 18.145.910

Effective date—Implementation—1989 c 382.

This act shall take effect September 1, 1989, except that the director may immediately take such steps as are necessary to ensure that this act is implemented on its effective date.

[ 1989 c 382 s 16.]